Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB6061.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 279a. (1) For tax years beginning on and after the effective date of the amendatory act that added this section and subject to the limitations under this section, a qualified taxpayer who either graduated from a high school located in this state or received a bachelor's, master's, or other higher graduate degree from a postsecondary educational institution located in this state and remained in, or relocated back to, this state for employment with an employer located in this state after obtaining a bachelor's, master's, or other higher graduate degree from a postsecondary educational institution may claim a credit against the tax imposed by this part equal to 50% of the amount paid on a qualified student loan by the qualified taxpayer during the tax year. (2) A qualified taxpayer shall not claim a credit under this section for any single tax year that is equal to more than 20% of the average yearly tuition to attend a public university located in this state. A qualified taxpayer is eligible to claim the credit allowed under this section only within the 10 tax years immediately following the qualified taxpayer's graduation from the postsecondary educational institution. (3) To be eligible for the credit under this section, the qualified taxpayer shall provide the department with proof of the applicable degree and proof of employment in this state. The department may also require reasonable proof from the qualified taxpayer in support of payments claimed to be paid for a qualified student loan under this section. (4) If the credit allowed under this section exceeds the qualified taxpayer's tax liability for the tax year, that portion that exceeds the tax liability for the tax year must be refunded. Enacting section 1. This amendatory act does not take effect unless all of the following bills of the 103rd Legislature are enacted into law: (a) Senate Bill No. ____ (request no. S00317'25) or House Bill No. 6062 (request no. H00317'25). (b) Senate Bill No. ____ (request no. S01002'25) or House Bill No. 6063 (request no. H01002'25). (c) Senate Bill No. ____ (request no. S01765'25) or House Bill No. 6064 (request no. H01765'25). (d) Senate Bill No. ____ (request no. S04326'25) or House Bill No. 6065 (request no. H04326'25).